Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-927
Mentally ill and dangerous subject; board; issue warrant; contents; immunity.

If the mental health board finds the subject to be mentally ill and dangerous and commits the subject to the custody of the Department of Health and Human Services to receive inpatient treatment, the department shall secure placement of the subject in an appropriate inpatient treatment facility to receive such treatment. The board shall issue a warrant authorizing the administrator of such treatment facility to receive and keep the subject as a patient. The warrant shall state the findings of the board and the legal settlement of the subject, if known, or any available information relating thereto. Such warrant shall shield every official and employee of the treatment facility against all liability to prosecution of any kind on account of the reception and detention of the subject if the detention is otherwise in accordance with the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, and policies of the treatment facility.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 51;

Laws 1985, LB 252, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 337, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1041;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 47.